Massachusetts, session 194th, S1040.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 63 of chapter 277 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in line 16, the figure “15” and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- "30."
of 1